Illinois, session 104th, HB4128.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing the title of the Act and by adding Section 9-3.6 as 6follows: 7    (720 ILCS 5/9-3.6 new)8    Sec. 9-3.6. Failure to report a death.9    (a) A person commits failure to report a death when he or 10she knows or reasonably should know that a person is deceased 11and fails to report the death to a law enforcement agency 12within 24 hours after the person's discovery of the death.13    (b) A person must report the death of another person to the 14law enforcement agency of the county where the corpse was 15found if the person believes that the death was caused by a 16homicide, accident, or other suspicious circumstance. 17    (c) Sentence. Failure to report a death is a Class 4 18felony.  19    Section 10. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 20amended by changing Section 110-6.1 as follows: 21    (725 ILCS 5/110-6.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 110-6.1)  HB4128- 2 -LRB104 14620 RLC 27762 b1    Sec. 110-6.1. Denial of pretrial release. 2    (a) Upon verified petition by the State, the court shall 3hold a hearing and may deny a defendant pretrial release only 4if:5        (1) the defendant is charged with a felony offense 6    other than a forcible felony for which, based on the 7    charge or the defendant's criminal history, a sentence of 8    imprisonment, without probation, periodic imprisonment, or 9    conditional discharge, is required by law upon conviction, 10    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 11    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 12    or persons or the community, based on the specific 13    articulable facts of the case;14        (1.5) the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 15    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 16    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 17    of the case, and the defendant is charged with a forcible 18    felony, which as used in this Section, means treason, 19    first degree murder, second degree murder, predatory 20    criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal 21    sexual assault, criminal sexual assault, armed robbery, 22    aggravated robbery, robbery, burglary where there is use 23    of force against another person, residential burglary, 24    home invasion, vehicular invasion, aggravated arson, 25    arson, aggravated kidnaping, kidnaping, aggravated battery 26    resulting in great bodily harm or permanent disability or   HB4128- 3 -LRB104 14620 RLC 27762 b1    disfigurement, or any other felony which involves the 2    threat of or infliction of great bodily harm or permanent 3    disability or disfigurement; 4        (2) the defendant is charged with stalking or 5    aggravated stalking, and it is alleged that the 6    defendant's pre-trial release poses a real and present 7    threat to the safety of a victim of the alleged offense, 8    and denial of release is necessary to prevent fulfillment 9    of the threat upon which the charge is based;10        (3) the defendant is charged with a violation of an 11    order of protection issued under Section 112A-14 of this 12    Code or Section 214 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act 13    of 1986, a stalking no contact order under Section 80 of 14    the Stalking No Contact Order Act, or of a civil no contact 15    order under Section 213 of the Civil No Contact Order Act, 16    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 17    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 18    or persons or the community, based on the specific 19    articulable facts of the case;20        (4) the defendant is charged with domestic battery or 21    aggravated domestic battery under Section 12-3.2 or 12-3.3 22    of the Criminal Code of 2012 and it is alleged that the 23    defendant's pretrial release poses a real and present 24    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 25    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 26    case;  HB4128- 4 -LRB104 14620 RLC 27762 b1        (5) the defendant is charged with any offense under 2    Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012, except for 3    Sections 11-14, 11-14.1, 11-18, 11-20, 11-30, 11-35, 4    11-40, and 11-45 of the Criminal Code of 2012, or similar 5    provisions of the Criminal Code of 1961 and it is alleged 6    that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real and 7    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 8    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 9    the case; 10        (6) the defendant is charged with any of the following 11    offenses under the Criminal Code of 2012, and it is 12    alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 13    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 14    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 15    of the case:16            (A) Section 24-1.2 (aggravated discharge of a 17        firearm);18            (B) Section 24-1.2-5 24-2.5 (aggravated discharge 19        of a machine gun or a firearm equipped with a device 20        designed or used use for silencing the report of a 21        firearm);22            (C) Section 24-1.5 (reckless discharge of a 23        firearm);24            (D) Section 24-1.7 (unlawful possession of a 25        firearm by a repeat felony offender);26            (E) Section 24-2.2 (manufacture, sale, or transfer   HB4128- 5 -LRB104 14620 RLC 27762 b1        of bullets or shells represented to be armor piercing 2        bullets, dragon's breath shotgun shells, bolo shells, 3        or flechette shells);4            (F) Section 24-3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 5        firearms);6            (G) Section 24-3.3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 7        firearms on the premises of any school);8            (H) Section 24-34 (unlawful sale of firearms by 9        liquor license);10            (I) Section 24-3.5 (unlawful purchase of a 11        firearm);12            (J) Section 24-3A (gunrunning);13            (K) Section 24-3B (firearms trafficking);14            (L) Section 10-9 (b) (involuntary servitude);15            (M) Section 10-9 (c) (involuntary sexual servitude 16        of a minor);17            (N) Section 10-9(d) (trafficking in persons);18            (O) Non-probationable violations: (i) unlawful 19        possession of weapons by felons or persons in the 20        Custody of the Department of Corrections facilities 21        (Section 24-1.1), (ii) aggravated unlawful possession 22        of a weapon (Section 24-1.6), or (iii) aggravated 23        possession of a stolen firearm (Section 24-3.9); 24            (P) Section 9-3 (reckless homicide and involuntary 25        manslaughter);26            (P-1) Section 9-3.6 (failure to report a death);   HB4128- 6 -LRB104 14620 RLC 27762 b1            (Q) Section 19-3 (residential burglary);2            (R) Section 10-5 (child abduction);3            (S) Felony violations of Section 12C-5 (child 4        endangerment);5            (T) Section 12-7.1 (hate crime); 6            (U) Section 10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful 7        restraint); 8            (V) Section 12-9 (threatening a public official); 9            (W) Subdivision (f)(1) of Section 12-3.05 10        (aggravated battery with a deadly weapon other than by 11        discharge of a firearm); 12        (6.5) the defendant is charged with any of the 13    following offenses, and it is alleged that the defendant's 14    pretrial release poses a real and present threat to the 15    safety of any person or persons or the community, based on 16    the specific articulable facts of the case: 17            (A) Felony violations of Sections 3.01, 3.02, or 18        3.03 of the Humane Care for Animals Act (cruel 19        treatment, aggravated cruelty, and animal torture);20            (B) Subdivision (d)(1)(B) of Section 11-501 of the 21        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 22        influence while operating a school bus with 23        passengers);24            (C) Subdivision (d)(1)(C) of Section 11-501 of the 25        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 26        influence causing great bodily harm);  HB4128- 7 -LRB104 14620 RLC 27762 b1            (D) Subdivision (d)(1)(D) of Section 11-501 of the 2        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 3        influence after a previous reckless homicide 4        conviction);5            (E) Subdivision (d)(1)(F) of Section 11-501 of the 6        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 7        influence leading to death); or8            (F) Subdivision (d)(1)(J) of Section 11-501 of the 9        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 10        influence that resulted in bodily harm to a child 11        under the age of 16);12        (7) the defendant is charged with an attempt to commit 13    any charge listed in paragraphs (1) through (6.5), and it 14    is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a 15    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 16    persons or the community, based on the specific 17    articulable facts of the case; or 18        (8) the person has a high likelihood of willful flight 19    to avoid prosecution and is charged with:20            (A) Any felony described in subdivisions (a)(1) 21        through (a)(7) of this Section; or22            (B) A felony offense other than a Class 4 offense. 23    (b) If the charged offense is a felony, as part of the 24detention hearing, the court shall determine whether there is 25probable cause the defendant has committed an offense, unless 26a hearing pursuant to Section 109-3 of this Code has already   HB4128- 8 -LRB104 14620 RLC 27762 b1been held or a grand jury has returned a true bill of 2indictment against the defendant. If there is a finding of no 3probable cause, the defendant shall be released. No such 4finding is necessary if the defendant is charged with a 5misdemeanor.6    (c) Timing of petition. 7        (1) A petition may be filed without prior notice to 8    the defendant at the first appearance before a judge, or 9    within the 21 calendar days, except as provided in Section 10    110-6, after arrest and release of the defendant upon 11    reasonable notice to defendant; provided that while such 12    petition is pending before the court, the defendant if 13    previously released shall not be detained.14        (2) Upon filing, the court shall immediately hold a 15    hearing on the petition unless a continuance is requested. 16    If a continuance is requested and granted, the hearing 17    shall be held within 48 hours of the defendant's first 18    appearance if the defendant is charged with first degree 19    murder or a Class X, Class 1, Class 2, or Class 3 felony, 20    and within 24 hours if the defendant is charged with a 21    Class 4 or misdemeanor offense. The Court may deny or 22    grant the request for continuance. If the court decides to 23    grant the continuance, the Court retains the discretion to 24    detain or release the defendant in the time between the 25    filing of the petition and the hearing.26    (d) Contents of petition.  HB4128- 9 -LRB104 14620 RLC 27762 b1        (1) The petition shall be verified by the State and 2    shall state the grounds upon which it contends the 3    defendant should be denied pretrial release, including the 4    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 5    persons or the community, based on the specific 6    articulable facts or flight risk, as appropriate.7        (2) If the State seeks to file a second or subsequent 8    petition under this Section, the State shall be required 9    to present a verified application setting forth in detail 10    any new facts not known or obtainable at the time of the 11    filing of the previous petition.12    (e) Eligibility: All defendants shall be presumed eligible 13for pretrial release, and the State shall bear the burden of 14proving by clear and convincing evidence that:15        (1) the proof is evident or the presumption great that 16    the defendant has committed an offense listed in 17    subsection (a), and18        (2) for offenses listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) 19    of subsection (a), the defendant poses a real and present 20    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 21    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 22    case, by conduct which may include, but is not limited to, 23    a forcible felony, the obstruction of justice, 24    intimidation, injury, or abuse as defined by paragraph (1) 25    of Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 26    1986, and  HB4128- 10 -LRB104 14620 RLC 27762 b1        (3) no condition or combination of conditions set 2    forth in subsection (b) of Section 110-10 of this Article 3    can mitigate (i) the real and present threat to the safety 4    of any person or persons or the community, based on the 5    specific articulable facts of the case, for offenses 6    listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) of subsection (a), or 7    (ii) the defendant's willful flight for offenses listed in 8    paragraph (8) of subsection (a), and9        (4) for offenses under subsection (b) of Section 407 10    of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act that are subject 11    to paragraph (1) of subsection (a), no condition or 12    combination of conditions set forth in subsection (b) of 13    Section 110-10 of this Article can mitigate the real and 14    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 15    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 16    the case, and the defendant poses a serious risk to not 17    appear in court as required.18    (f) Conduct of the hearings.19        (1) Prior to the hearing, the State shall tender to 20    the defendant copies of the defendant's criminal history 21    available, any written or recorded statements, and the 22    substance of any oral statements made by any person, if 23    relied upon by the State in its petition, and any police 24    reports in the prosecutor's possession at the time of the 25    hearing.26        (2) The State or defendant may present evidence at the   HB4128- 11 -LRB104 14620 RLC 27762 b1    hearing by way of proffer based upon reliable information.2        (3) The defendant has the right to be represented by 3    counsel, and if he or she is indigent, to have counsel 4    appointed for him or her. The defendant shall have the 5    opportunity to testify, to present witnesses on his or her 6    own behalf, and to cross-examine any witnesses that are 7    called by the State. Defense counsel shall be given 8    adequate opportunity to confer with the defendant before 9    any hearing at which conditions of release or the 10    detention of the defendant are to be considered, with an 11    accommodation for a physical condition made to facilitate 12    attorney/client consultation. If defense counsel needs to 13    confer or consult with the defendant during any hearing 14    conducted via a 2-way two-way audio-visual communication 15    system, such consultation shall not be recorded and shall 16    be undertaken consistent with constitutional protections. 17        (3.5) A hearing at which pretrial release may be 18    denied must be conducted in person (and not by way of 2-way 19    two-way audio visual communication) unless the accused 20    waives the right to be present physically in court, the 21    court determines that the physical health and safety of 22    any person necessary to the proceedings would be 23    endangered by appearing in court, or the chief judge of 24    the circuit orders use of that system due to operational 25    challenges in conducting the hearing in person. Such 26    operational challenges must be documented and approved by   HB4128- 12 -LRB104 14620 RLC 27762 b1    the chief judge of the circuit, and a plan to address the 2    challenges through reasonable efforts must be presented 3    and approved by the Administrative Office of the Illinois 4    Courts every 6 months. 5        (4) If the defense seeks to compel the complaining 6    witness to testify as a witness in its favor, it shall 7    petition the court for permission. When the ends of 8    justice so require, the court may exercise its discretion 9    and compel the appearance of a complaining witness. The 10    court shall state on the record reasons for granting a 11    defense request to compel the presence of a complaining 12    witness only on the issue of the defendant's pretrial 13    detention. In making a determination under this Section, 14    the court shall state on the record the reason for 15    granting a defense request to compel the presence of a 16    complaining witness, and only grant the request if the 17    court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the 18    defendant will be materially prejudiced if the complaining 19    witness does not appear. Cross-examination of a 20    complaining witness at the pretrial detention hearing for 21    the purpose of impeaching the witness' credibility is 22    insufficient reason to compel the presence of the witness. 23    In deciding whether to compel the appearance of a 24    complaining witness, the court shall be considerate of the 25    emotional and physical well-being of the witness. The 26    pre-trial detention hearing is not to be used for purposes   HB4128- 13 -LRB104 14620 RLC 27762 b1    of discovery, and the post arraignment rules of discovery 2    do not apply. The State shall tender to the defendant, 3    prior to the hearing, copies, if any, of the defendant's 4    criminal history, if available, and any written or 5    recorded statements and the substance of any oral 6    statements made by any person, if in the State's 7    Attorney's possession at the time of the hearing. 8        (5) The rules concerning the admissibility of evidence 9    in criminal trials do not apply to the presentation and 10    consideration of information at the hearing. At the trial 11    concerning the offense for which the hearing was conducted 12    neither the finding of the court nor any transcript or 13    other record of the hearing shall be admissible in the 14    State's case-in-chief, but shall be admissible for 15    impeachment, or as provided in Section 115-10.1 of this 16    Code, or in a perjury proceeding.17        (6) The defendant may not move to suppress evidence or 18    a confession, however, evidence that proof of the charged 19    crime may have been the result of an unlawful search or 20    seizure, or both, or through improper interrogation, is 21    relevant in assessing the weight of the evidence against 22    the defendant.23        (7) Decisions regarding release, conditions of 24    release, and detention prior to trial must be 25    individualized, and no single factor or standard may be 26    used exclusively to order detention. Risk assessment tools   HB4128- 14 -LRB104 14620 RLC 27762 b1    may not be used as the sole basis to deny pretrial release. 2    (g) Factors to be considered in making a determination of 3dangerousness. The court may, in determining whether the 4defendant poses a real and present threat to the safety of any 5person or persons or the community, based on the specific 6articulable facts of the case, consider, but shall not be 7limited to, evidence or testimony concerning:8        (1) The nature and circumstances of any offense 9    charged, including whether the offense is a crime of 10    violence, involving a weapon, or a sex offense.11        (2) The history and characteristics of the defendant 12    including:13            (A) Any evidence of the defendant's prior criminal 14        history indicative of violent, abusive, or assaultive 15        behavior, or lack of such behavior. Such evidence may 16        include testimony or documents received in juvenile 17        proceedings, criminal, quasi-criminal, civil 18        commitment, domestic relations, or other proceedings.19            (B) Any evidence of the defendant's psychological, 20        psychiatric or other similar social history which 21        tends to indicate a violent, abusive, or assaultive 22        nature, or lack of any such history.23        (3) The identity of any person or persons to whose 24    safety the defendant is believed to pose a threat, and the 25    nature of the threat.26        (4) Any statements made by, or attributed to the   HB4128- 15 -LRB104 14620 RLC 27762 b1    defendant, together with the circumstances surrounding 2    them.3        (5) The age and physical condition of the defendant.4        (6) The age and physical condition of any victim or 5    complaining witness. 6        (7) Whether the defendant is known to possess or have 7    access to any weapon or weapons.8        (8) Whether, at the time of the current offense or any 9    other offense or arrest, the defendant was on probation, 10    parole, aftercare release, mandatory supervised release, 11    or other release from custody pending trial, sentencing, 12    appeal, or completion of sentence for an offense under 13    federal or State state law.14        (9) Any other factors, including those listed in 15    Section 110-5 of this Article deemed by the court to have a 16    reasonable bearing upon the defendant's propensity or 17    reputation for violent, abusive, or assaultive behavior, 18    or lack of such behavior.19    (h) Detention order. The court shall, in any order for 20detention:21        (1) make a written finding summarizing the court's 22    reasons for concluding that the defendant should be denied 23    pretrial release, including why less restrictive 24    conditions would not avoid a real and present threat to 25    the safety of any person or persons or the community, 26    based on the specific articulable facts of the case, or   HB4128- 16 -LRB104 14620 RLC 27762 b1    prevent the defendant's willful flight from prosecution;2        (2) direct that the defendant be committed to the 3    custody of the sheriff for confinement in the county jail 4    pending trial;5        (3) direct that the defendant be given a reasonable 6    opportunity for private consultation with counsel, and for 7    communication with others of his or her choice by 8    visitation, mail and telephone; and9        (4) direct that the sheriff deliver the defendant as 10    required for appearances in connection with court 11    proceedings.12    (i) Detention. If the court enters an order for the 13detention of the defendant pursuant to subsection (e) of this 14Section, the defendant shall be brought to trial on the 15offense for which he is detained within 90 days after the date 16on which the order for detention was entered. If the defendant 17is not brought to trial within the 90-day period required by 18the preceding sentence, he shall not be denied pretrial 19release. In computing the 90-day period, the court shall omit 20any period of delay resulting from a continuance granted at 21the request of the defendant and any period of delay resulting 22from a continuance granted at the request of the State with 23good cause shown pursuant to Section 103-5.24    (i-5) At each subsequent appearance of the defendant 25before the court, the judge must find that continued detention 26is necessary to avoid a real and present threat to the safety   HB4128- 17 -LRB104 14620 RLC 27762 b1of any person or persons or the community, based on the 2specific articulable facts of the case, or to prevent the 3defendant's willful flight from prosecution. 4    (j) Rights of the defendant. The defendant shall be 5entitled to appeal any order entered under this Section 6denying his or her pretrial release.7    (k) Appeal. The State may appeal any order entered under 8this Section denying any motion for denial of pretrial 9release.10    (l) Presumption of innocence. Nothing in this Section 11shall be construed as modifying or limiting in any way the 12defendant's presumption of innocence in further criminal 13proceedings.14    (m) Interest of victims. 15        (1) Crime victims shall be given notice by the State's 16    Attorney's office of this hearing as required in paragraph 17    (1) of subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of the Rights of Crime 18    Victims and Witnesses Act and shall be informed of their 19    opportunity at this hearing to obtain a protective order. 20        (2) If the defendant is denied pretrial release, the 21    court may impose a no contact provision with the victim or 22    other interested party that shall be enforced while the 23    defendant remains in custody. 24(Source: P.A. 102-1104, eff. 1-1-23; 103-822, eff. 1-1-25; 25revised 10-23-24.)